Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1713
Proposal, defined.

Proposal means an offer in response to a request for proposals (1) by a design-builder to enter into a design-build contract or (2) by a construction manager to enter into a construction manager-general contractor contract.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 14.